test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kiott_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ǩiõtt: # Noun e-stem "hand, arm/käsi" - full paradigm
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: ǩiõtt
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: ǩiõđ
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: ǩiõđ
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: ǩiõʹtte
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: ǩiõđâst
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Com+Indef: ǩiõđin
     ǩiõtt+N+Ess+Indef: ǩiõttân
     ǩiõtt+N+Par+Indef: ǩiõttâd
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [ǩiõđtaa, ǩiõđtää]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: ǩiõđ
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: ǩiõđi
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: ǩiõđid
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: ǩiõđid
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: ǩiõđin
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Com+Indef: ǩiõđivuiʹm
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [ǩiõđitaa, ǩiõđitää]
#PxSg1
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ǩiõttam
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ǩiõttan, ǩiõđan]
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ǩiõttan, ǩiõđan]
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: ǩiõʹttsan
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ǩiõʹđstan, ǩiõđstan]
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: ǩiõđinan
     ǩiõtt+N+Ess+PxSg1: ǩiõttnan
#     ǩiõtt+N+Par+PxSg1: ǩiõttnad
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg1: [ǩiõttantaa, ǩiõttantää, ǩiõđantaa, ǩiõđantää]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ǩiõttan, ǩiõđan]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [ǩiõđään, ǩiõđaan]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ǩiõđään, ǩiõđaan]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: [ǩiõđään, ǩiõđaan]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ǩiõđinan
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: [ǩiõđäänvuiʹm, ǩiõđaanvuiʹm]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg1: [ǩiõđääntaa, ǩiõđääntää, ǩiõđaantaa, ǩiõđaantää]

#PxSg2
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ǩiõttad
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ǩiõđad
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ǩiõđad
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: ǩiõʹttsad
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [ǩiõʹđstad, ǩiõđstad]
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: ǩiõđinad
     ǩiõtt+N+Ess+PxSg2: ǩiõttnad
#     ǩiõtt+N+Par+PxSg2: ǩiõttnad
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg2: [ǩiõđadtaa, ǩiõđadtää]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ǩiõđad
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [ǩiõđääd, ǩiõđaad]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [ǩiõđääd, ǩiõđaad]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: [ǩiõđääd, ǩiõđaad]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ǩiõđinad
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [ǩiõđäädvuiʹm, ǩiõđaadvuiʹm]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg2: [ǩiõđäädtaa, ǩiõđäädtää, ǩiõđaadtaa, ǩiõđaadtää]

#PxSg3
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ǩiõttâs
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ǩiõđâs
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ǩiõđâs
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: ǩiõttses
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [ǩiõʹđstes, ǩiõđstes]
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: ǩiõđines
     ǩiõtt+N+Ess+PxSg3: ǩiõttnes
#     ǩiõtt+N+Par+PxSg3: ǩiõttnes
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxSg3: [ǩiõđâstaa, ǩiõđâstää]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ǩiõđâs
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ǩiõđees
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ǩiõđees
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: ǩiõđes
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ǩiõđines
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: ǩiõđeesvuiʹm
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxSg3: [ǩiõđeestaa, ǩiõđeestää]

#PxPl1
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ǩiõttâm
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: [ǩiõttân, ǩiõđân]
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: [ǩiõttân, ǩiõđân]
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: ǩiõttseen
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [ǩiõʹđsteen, ǩiõđsteen]
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: ǩiõđineen
     ǩiõtt+N+Ess+PxPl1: ǩiõttneen
#     ǩiõtt+N+Par+PxPl1: ǩiõttneed
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl1: [ǩiõttântaa, ǩiõttântää, ǩiõđântaa, ǩiõđântää]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: [ǩiõttân, ǩiõđân]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ǩiõđeen
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ǩiõđeen
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: ǩiõđeen
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ǩiõđineen
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: ǩiõđeenvuiʹm
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl1: [ǩiõđeentaa, ǩiõđeentää]

#PxPl2
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ǩiõttâd
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ǩiõđâd
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ǩiõđâd
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: ǩiõttseed
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [ǩiõʹđsteed, ǩiõđsteed]
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: ǩiõđineed
     ǩiõtt+N+Ess+PxPl2: ǩiõttneed
#     ǩiõtt+N+Par+PxPl2: ǩiõttneed
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl2: [ǩiõđâdtaa, ǩiõđâdtää]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ǩiõđâd
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ǩiõđeed
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ǩiõđeed
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: ǩiõđeed
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ǩiõđineed
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Com+PxPl2: ǩiõđeedvuiʹm
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl2: [ǩiõđeedtaa, ǩiõđeedtää]

#PxPl3
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ǩiõttâz
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ǩiõđâz
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ǩiõđâz
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: ǩiõttseez
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [ǩiõʹđsteez, ǩiõđsteez]
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: ǩiõđineez
     ǩiõtt+N+Ess+PxPl3: ǩiõttneez
#     ǩiõtt+N+Par+PxPl3: ǩiõttneez
     ǩiõtt+N+Sg+Abe+PxPl3: [ǩiõđâztaa, ǩiõđâztää]
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ǩiõđâz
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ǩiõđeez
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ǩiõđeez
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: ǩiõđeez
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ǩiõđineez
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Com+PxPl3: ǩiõđeezvuiʹm
     ǩiõtt+N+Pl+Abe+PxPl3: [ǩiõđeeztaa, ǩiõđeeztää]
